Illinois, session 104th, HB5570.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Revenue Law of the Civil 5Administrative Code of Illinois is amended by adding Section 62505-820 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 2505/2505-820 new)8    Sec. 2505-820. Property tax replacement feasibility study. 9Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Department, in 10consultation with the Governor's Office of Management and 11Budget, shall conduct a study to determine the feasibility of 12phasing out the use of property taxes as a funding source for 13school districts and replacing that revenue with other State 14and local revenue streams, including, but not limited to, 15income taxes, estate taxes, real estate transfer taxes, 16cannabis taxes, use and occupation taxes, and capital gains 17taxes. The study shall (i) examine other states that do not 18primarily fund schools through property taxes and (ii) propose 19spending cuts or an increased revenue to facilitate the 20change.